Utah statutes.
62A-15-110.   Contracts for substance abuse and mental health services --
Provisions -- Responsibilities.
(1)  If the division contracts with a local substance abuse authority or a
local mental health authority to provide substance abuse or mental health
programs and services in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and
Title 17, Chapter 43, Part 2, Local Substance Abuse Authorities, or Title 17,
Chapter 43, Part 3, Local Mental Health Authorities, it shall ensure that
those contracts include at least the following provisions:
(a)  that an independent auditor shall conduct any audit of the local
substance abuse authority or its contract provider's programs or services and
any audit of the local mental health authority or its contract provider's
programs or services, pursuant to the provisions of Title 51, Chapter 2a,
Accounting Reports from Political Subdivisions, Interlocal Organizations, and
Other Local Entities Act;
(b)  in addition to the requirements described in Title 51, Chapter 2a,
Accounting Reports from Political Subdivisions, Interlocal Organizations, and
Other Local Entities Act, the division:
(i)  shall prescribe guidelines and procedures, in accordance with those
formulated by the state auditor pursuant to Section 67-3-1, for auditing the
compensation and expenses of officers, directors, and specified employees of
the private contract provider, to assure the state that no personal benefit is
gained from travel or other expenses; and
(ii)  may prescribe specific items to be addressed by that audit, depending
upon the particular needs or concerns relating to the local substance abuse
authority, local mental health authority, or contract provider at issue;
(c)  the local substance abuse authority or its contract provider and the
local mental health authority and its contract provider shall invite and
include all funding partners in its auditor's pre- and exit conferences;
(d)  each member of the local substance abuse authority and each member of the
local mental health authority shall annually certify that he has received and
reviewed the independent audit and has participated in a formal interview with
the provider's executive officers;
(e)  requested information and outcome data will be provided to the division
in the manner and within the time lines defined by the division; and
(f)  all audit reports by state or county persons or entities concerning the
local substance abuse authority or its contract provider, or the local mental
health authority or its contract provider shall be provided to the executive
director of the department, the local substance abuse authority or local
mental health authority, and members of the contract provider's governing
board.
(2)  Each contract between the division and a local substance abuse authority
or a local mental health authority shall authorize the division to withhold
funds, otherwise allocated under Section 62A-15-108, to cover the costs of
audits, attorney fees, and other expenditures associated with reviewing the
expenditure of public funds by a local substance abuse authority or its
contract provider or a local mental health authority or its contract provider,
if there has been an audit finding or judicial determination that public funds
have been misused by the local substance abuse authority or its contract
provider or the local mental health authority or its contract provider.
